California statutes. Education Code
(2) The intersegmental cooperative nature of the Cash for College Program has proved to be a highly effective mechanism to coordinate existing services and foster the cooperation of the various educational segments, community, and business partners involved.

(3) The Cash for College Program has been successful because of the financial and volunteer contributions of local partners in private business and industry, the financial aid, admissions, and outreach communities, and student groups. Additional funding has been provided through these local and regional partnerships, and through one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in private foundation grant funds that have supported the initial development of the program, and funded local scholarships offered to workshop participants who
 complete the financial aid process by the state filing deadline.

(4) The Cash for College Program has assisted high school and community college students whose families were unfamiliar with the financial aid process. The program focuses on assisting students and their families who are first- or second-generation college-bound students who have little or no access to college advising because of limited resources at the schoolsite or the perception that college is not an option.

(5) The Cash for College Program seeks to provide all California students who desire to attend college the opportunity to enroll by providing tangible assistance in accessing the available state and federal resources to make higher education possible.

(6) A college or postsecondary education is a requirement for a working wage job. The wage
 disparity between a high school graduate and a college graduate is one million dollars ($1,000,000) over an individual’s lifespan.

(7) California reflects the ethnic and cultural diversity of today’s world. Evidence of this change is most pronounced within our public elementary and secondary education system. As California continues into the 21st century, there is no single group that represents a majority of elementary and secondary enrollment. These changing demographics present great challenges and great opportunities.

(8) California must invest in higher education and in the future of its young people so they can acquire skills and knowledge necessary to continue the state’s economic recovery.

(9) The Cash for College Program provides access to the college financial aid process for students of varied backgrounds
 and socioeconomic status.

(b) (1) Beginning January 1, 2008, the Cash for College Program is established and is administered by the commission, in partnership with private business and industry and local community and educational organizations. The commission may allocate funds for support of local Cash for College financial aid workshop efforts that are designed to accomplish the following goals:

(A) Targeted outreach to, and assistance for, low-income and first-generation college-bound students with state and federal financial aid applications.

(B) Targeted outreach to, and assistance for, students who are enrolled in schools or geographic regions with low college eligibility or participation rates, with state and federal financial aid applications.

(2) The projects and organizations funded under this article shall implement all of the following activities:

(A) Organize and conduct free local and regional workshops that help students and families to fill out the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) and the Cal Grant grade point average verification form required for Cal Grants.

(B) Convene advisory board meetings to develop regional partnerships with local partners in private business and industry, admissions and outreach communities, and student groups, to foster financial and volunteer contributions.

(c) The commission shall, by December 1 of each year, provide a report to the fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature on the Cash for College Program detailing program data,
 expenditures, and the findings of an independent evaluation on the extent to which program goals have been met. Program data shall include the number of completed FAFSA applications, the number of submitted grade point average verifications, and the number of Cal Grant recipients using their Cal Grant awards at California postsecondary institutions.

(d) The commission shall contract with an external evaluator to conduct the independent evaluation.

(e) (1) The commission may accept voluntary contributions or donations in cash to pay for the costs of implementing the program pursuant to this article. Voluntary contributions shall be deposited into the Cash for College Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Only moneys contributed or donated for the purposes of this article may be deposited into the fund. The fund shall be credited with all
 investment income earned by moneys in the fund. The moneys received in contributions or donations for the purposes of this article are not part of the General Fund as defined in Section 16300 of the Government Code. Voluntary contributions or donations are special funds held in trust for purposes of meeting the purposes of this article. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the fund from voluntary contributions or donations are hereby continuously appropriated to the commission without regard to fiscal year for the purposes enumerated in this article.

(2) Additional funds may be appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the purposes of this article.

(f) (1) As used in this subdivision, “regional coordinating organization” means a coalition of entities led by a designated organization, which may include nonprofit organizations, local
 education or other government agencies, or public or private higher education institutions.

(2) The commission shall allocate funds to regional coordinating organizations to plan, coordinate, or conduct Cash for College workshop series within specified regions within the state.

(3) The commission shall require a regional coordinating organization to contribute equal or greater resources to match the Cash for College funds allocated to it by the commission. Funds allocated to a regional coordinating organization under this subdivision shall be based on demonstrated ability to contribute equal or greater matching resources or funds. The commission may require advance payment, if it determines that it is necessary to ensure that funds provided pursuant to this article are available each year before the start of the program.

(4) The commission may partner with regional coordinating organizations or other entities to facilitate additional nonstate funding or donations of property, or both, for the Cash for College Program.

(5) Notwithstanding Section 11005 of the Government Code, the commission may accept gifts of personal property without approval of the Director of Finance.

(6) In addition to the projects and organizations funded pursuant to this article, an organization that is not part of a regional coordinating organization, including high schools and community-based organizations, but has a written partnership agreement with the commission or a regional coordinating organization, may offer free local and regional workshops through the Cash for College Program.

(g) The commission may use the moneys appropriated for the
 program, including reasonable administrative costs, marketing, and external evaluation. Administrative costs shall include appropriate staffing to support the program, including, but not limited to, a Cash for College coordinator. The commission shall annually establish the total amount of funding to assist regional coordinating organizations. Allocation of funds shall be established based upon the best use of funding for that year, as determined by the commission in consultation with a Cash for College statewide advisory board that may include, but is not limited to, partners in private business and industry, admissions, outreach communities, and student groups.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 188, Sec. 5.   (SB 886)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. California Student Opportunity and Access Program [69560. - 69566.]

69560.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Lack of information about postsecondary educational opportunities and financial aid are primary barriers to postsecondary education for pupils from schools that have low college eligibility and participation rates.

(b) Since its inception in 1978, the California Student Opportunity and Access Program (Cal-SOAP) has focused on increasing the availability of information and improving college access to postsecondary education for historically underserved student populations by creating a college-going culture, focusing
 on financial aid application completion, and coordinating student outreach efforts.

(c) The intersegmental consortium nature of the program has proven to be a highly effective mechanism in coordinating existing services and in fostering the cooperation of the various education segments and partner organizations involved.

(d) An essential core of state funding for the program is required to maintain its intersegmental character, which has generated better communication, understanding, and teamwork resulting in a high-impact collective effort, while minimizing duplication of services in a geographic area.

(e) Research demonstrates that many students do not have the financial means to cover the increasing costs of postsecondary education
 or access to adequate financial aid. Cal-SOAP projects assist pupils in becoming knowledgeable about education costs and financing options, including student financial aid, as they prepare to attain a postsecondary education.

(f) Cal-SOAP projects employ college students from historically underserved communities to serve as college success coaches. This is a cost-effective method to provide information and assistance regarding postsecondary education costs and financial aid opportunities to pupils from schools that have low postsecondary education eligibility and participation rates.

(g) Awareness of financial aid options has historically been a barrier for first-generation students and students from minority backgrounds trying to access a postsecondary education. Research shows that students are widely unaware of their financial aid options and have misconceptions of financial aid eligibility, leading many to not complete the financial aid process.

(h) The COVID-19 health pandemic has only exacerbated the challenges associated with declining rates of postsecondary education enrollment and financial aid application submissions for low-income and first-generation students. Students are in dire need of information and support to help them navigate the college-going process during these uncertain times.

(i) There is a critical need to modernize Cal-SOAP
 to focus on providing financial aid information and assistance with completing the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) and the California Dream Act Application (CADAA) to promote college opportunities for low-income and underserved students. Additionally, project staff assist students and families with overall financial aid literacy to help them make the best possible decisions in financing their postsecondary education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 575, Sec. 2.   (SB 737)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

69560.5.

As used in the article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “CADAA” means the California Dream Act Application.

(b) “Cal-SOAP” means the California Student Opportunity and Access Program.

(c) “FAFSA” means the Free Application for Federal Student Aid.

(d) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(e) “Public postsecondary educational institution” means a campus of the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 575, Sec. 3.   (SB 737)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

69561.

(a) The California Student Opportunity and Access Program is administered by the commission.

(b) (1) The commission may apportion funds on a progress payment schedule for the support of projects designed to increase the accessibility of postsecondary educational opportunities and financial aid for pupils from underserved communities who meet one or more of the following criteria:

(A) Pupils who are from low-income families.

(B) Pupils who would be the first in their families to attend a postsecondary educational institution.

(C) Pupils who are from schools or geographic regions with documented low postsecondary education eligibility or participation rates.

(D) Pupils who are homeless youth and former homeless youth, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66025.9, or who are at risk of becoming homeless.

(E) Pupils who are from mixed immigration status households or who themselves are immigrants.

(F) Pupils who are current or former foster youth. As used in this paragraph, “current or former foster youth” means a person whose dependency was established or continued by the court on or after the date on which the person reached 13 years of age.

(G) Pupils who identify as being LGBTQ+.

(H) Pupils who have a disability.

(I) Pupils who are part of a historically underserved minority group.

(2) The commission shall allocate up to 2 percent of funding appropriated for this program for program administration, data collection, and evaluation. Any funds allocated for these purposes are not subject to the match funding requirements of this article.

(c) These projects shall primarily do all of the following:

(1) Increase the availability of information for these pupils on the existence of
 postsecondary education, the total cost of attending a postsecondary educational institution, and financing options, including grants, scholarships, student loans, and work opportunities.

(2) Increase the number of pupils submitting completed financial aid applications, including the FAFSA or the CADAA, and assist pupils as needed with the financial aid verification process.

(3) Hire undergraduate or graduate students to serve as college success coaches to actively mentor pupils, encourage a college-going culture, help pupils plan for their postsecondary education, and help pupils complete a FAFSA or a CADAA for financial aid consideration. Projects should aim to hire college success coaches with similar backgrounds as pupils described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(d) Projects may assist community college students in transferring to four-year postsecondary educational institutions, and students in their first year at four-year postsecondary educational institutions, to the extent that project resources are
 available.

(e) Projects may provide assistance to middle school pupils described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) and their parents or guardians by implementing outreach efforts designed to inform them of the future availability of and access to postsecondary education financial assistance as a means of motivating pupils to stay in school and complete college preparatory courses.

(f) Projects shall provide assistance to high school pupils described in paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (b) and their parents or guardians by providing information on college preparation and on understanding the total cost of attending a postsecondary educational institution, and by assisting with completion of financial aid applications. Projects are encouraged to leverage commission outreach efforts, such as Cash for
 College workshops, to assist their students with completing the FAFSA or the CADAA.

(g) Projects shall promote the value of career technical education, available career programs in public schools and postsecondary segments with sequenced courses beginning in high school and continuing into postsecondary education, and the resulting career opportunities.

(h) Each project shall establish or strengthen regional collaborative relationships and partnerships. Each project shall be proposed and operated through a consortium that involves at least one secondary school district office, at least one four-year college or university, at least one community college, and at least one of the following agencies:

(1) A nonprofit
 educational, counseling, or community agency.

(2) A private vocational or technical school accredited by a national, state, or regional accrediting association recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(i) (1) The commission, in awarding initial project grants, shall give priority to
 the following proposals:

 (A) Proposals developed by more than three eligible agencies.

(B) Proposals in counties in which a four-year public postsecondary educational institution is not headquartered.

 (2) Projects
 shall be located throughout the state in order to provide access to program services in rural, urban, and suburban areas.

(j) The governing board of each project, composed of at least one representative from each entity in the consortium, shall establish management policy, approve and provide direction to the project director, set priorities for budgetary decisions that reflect the specific needs of the project, and assume responsibility for maintaining the required level of matching funds, including solicitations from the private sector and corporate sources.

(k) Before receiving a project grant, each consortium shall conduct a planning process and submit a comprehensive project proposal to include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(1) The agencies participating in the project.

(2) The pupils to be served by the project.

(3) The ways in which the project will reduce duplication and related costs.

(4) The methods for assessing the project’s impact.

(l) Each project shall include the direct involvement of secondary school staff in the daily operations of the project, with preference in funding to those projects that effectively integrate the objectives of Cal-SOAP with those of the school district in providing services that are essential to preparing pupils for postsecondary education.

(m) (1) Each project shall maintain
 a comprehensive pupil data system on pupils receiving services through the program in middle and high school within the participating districts. This information shall be maintained in a manner consistent with the law relating to pupil records. For purposes of assessing financial aid completion and evaluating program effectiveness, the commission shall require each project to submit on a periodic basis to the commission or a commission grantee designee certain outreach metrics for the purpose of evaluating the effectiveness of the program
 and the project. The following outreach metrics shall be reported:

(A) Individual student level data, including specification of each target population described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) that includes the student, for the following:

(i) High school graduates not described in clause (ii) or (iii) who were eligible for admission to a public postsecondary educational institution.

(ii) Students not described in clause (iii) who applied for admission at a public postsecondary educational institution.

(iii) Students who enrolled at a public postsecondary educational institution.

(B) Disaggregated data based on target populations described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) for the following:

(i) Students that
 received Cal-SOAP services.

(ii) Pupils that completed the FAFSA.

(iii) Pupils that completed the CADAA.

(2) For the purposes and facilitation of the evaluation of the programs and the projects funded pursuant to this article, project grantees, local educational agencies, the department, the University of California, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, and the commission may share student data, including personally identifiable information, with one another, including, but not necessarily limited to, information on pupils in grades 11 and 12 and students who have applied to a public postsecondary educational institution, for the purposes of outreach, completion of FAFSA and CADAA
 applications, and verification of application to and enrollment in a public postsecondary educational institution.

(3) Information shared under this subdivision shall be handled in compliance with all applicable state and federal privacy laws, including the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g).

(n) At least 30 percent or the equivalent of each project grant shall be allocated for stipends to college success coaches and for any costs associated with providing training or necessary supplies and equipment to the college success coaches who meet all of the following criteria:

(1) Work with middle and high school pupils.

(2) Are currently enrolled in a college or other postsecondary
 educational institution as an undergraduate or graduate student.

(3) Have demonstrated financial need, as defined by the commission, for the stipend.

(o) Each project should work cooperatively with other projects in the program and with the commission to establish viable student services and sound administrative procedures, and to ensure coordination of the activities of the project with existing educational opportunity programs.

(p) Surveys and other means developed by the projects may be used for purposes of students self-identifying the target populations described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) in which they are included. The surveys or other means established by the projects may be used instead of students providing documentation verifying the target populations described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) in which they are included.

(q) The commission may adopt
 regulations necessary for the implementation and evaluation of this program and individual projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 575, Sec. 4.   (SB 737)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

69562.

The Student Aid Commission shall establish a 12-member project grant advisory committee to advise project directors and the commission on the development and operation of the projects, and consisting of the following:

(a) Three representatives of outreach programs, representing the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges, appointed by their respective governing boards.

(b) One representative of private colleges and universities, appointed by the Association of California Independent Colleges and Universities.

(c) Two secondary school staff, appointed by the
 Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(d) Two persons representing the general public, one appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly and the other by the Senate Rules Committee.

(e) Two postsecondary students, both appointed annually by the commission.

(f) Two college campus financial aid officers, appointed by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 505, Sec. 10.   (AB 3255)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

69564.

Allocation of any funds appropriated for purposes of this article shall be limited to those consortia meeting requirements of this article who will provide equal matching resources from existing or budgeted increases in federal, state, local, and private funds. It shall be the goal of the program that the total resources provided by Cal-SOAP shall match state funding on at least a 1.5 to 1 ratio. Any new projects approved through expansion of the program shall provide equal matching resources for the first three years of operation and shall be encouraged to increase the matching
 resources to a 1.5 to 1 ratio with the state grant thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 575, Sec. 5.   (SB 737)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

69564.3.

Contingent upon sufficient funding provided for this purpose in the annual Budget Act or other statute, the commission shall ensure that at least one consortium is established, in accordance with Section 69561, to serve the pupils of Orange County. The commission shall retain authority over a consortium established pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.   (AB 584)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

69566.

It is the intent of the Legislature that funding for the purposes of this article be appropriated in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 626, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Assumption Program of Loans for Education [69612. - 69615.8.]

69612.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The growing shortage of high-quality teachers is most serious in particular subject areas, partly due to the shortage of students in these fields who enter the teaching profession.

(2) Many school districts have difficulty recruiting and retaining high-quality teachers for schools ranked in decile 1 or 2 on the Academic Performance Index, for pupils with special needs, for schools serving rural areas or large populations of pupils from low-income and linguistic minority families, and for schools with a high percentage of teachers holding emergency-type permits.

(3) The rising costs of higher education, coupled with a shift in available financial aid from scholarships and grants to loans, make the availability of financial aid and loan repayment assistance options an important consideration in a student’s decision to pursue a postsecondary education.

(b) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature that the Assumption Program of Loans for Education be designed to provide veteran teachers and outstanding postsecondary students, particularly economically disadvantaged students, with the assurance of financial assistance to encourage them to complete postsecondary education programs leading to teaching credentials, and to seek employment as teachers in designated subject-matter shortage areas or in schools serving a large population of pupils from low-income families, schools with a high percentage of teachers holding emergency-type permits, or schools ranked in the lowest two deciles on the Academic Performance Index.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 516, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

69612.5.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following definitions:

(a) “Eligible institution” means a postsecondary institution that is determined by the Student Aid Commission to meet both of the following requirements:

(1) The institution is eligible to participate in state and federal financial aid programs.

(2) The institution maintains a program of professional preparation that has been approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(b) “Eligible school” means a school that meets any of the following criteria:

(1) It serves a large population of pupils from low-income families, as designated by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(2) The institution has 20 percent or more teachers holding emergency-type permits including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Provisional internships.

(B) Short-term staff permits.

(C) Credential waivers.

(D) Substitute permits.

(3) It is a school that is ranked in the lowest two deciles on the Academic Performance Index.

(4) It is a school that serves a rural area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 516, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

69613.

(a) Program participants shall meet all of the following eligibility criteria prior to selection in the program and shall continue to meet these criteria, as appropriate, during the payment periods:

(1) The applicant has completed at least 60 semester units, or the equivalent, and is enrolled in an academic program leading to a baccalaureate degree at an eligible institution, has agreed to participate in a teacher internship program, or has been admitted to a program of professional preparation that has been approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(2) The applicant is currently enrolled in, or has been admitted to, a program in which he or she
 will be enrolled on at least a half-time basis, as determined by the participating institution. The applicant shall agree to maintain satisfactory academic progress and a minimum of half-time enrollment, as defined by the participating eligible institution.

(A) Except as provided in subparagraphs (B) and (C), if a person participating in the program fails to maintain at least half-time enrollment, as required by this article, under the terms of the agreement pursuant to paragraph (2), the loan assumption agreement shall be invalidated and the participant shall retain full liability for all student loan obligations. This subparagraph shall not apply if the participant is in his or her final semester or quarter in school and has no additional coursework required to obtain his or her teaching credential.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), if a program participant is unable to
 maintain at least half-time enrollment due to serious illness, pregnancy, or other natural causes, or is called to active military duty status, the participant is not required to retain full liability for the student loan obligation for a period not to exceed one calendar year, unless approved by the commission for a longer period.

(C) If a natural disaster prevents a program participant from maintaining at least half-time enrollment due to the interruption of instruction at the eligible institution, the term of the loan assumption agreement shall be extended for a period not to exceed one calendar year, unless approved by the commission for a longer period.

(3) The applicant has been judged by his or her postsecondary institution, school district, or county office of education to have outstanding ability on the basis of criteria that may include, but need not be limited to, any
 of the following:

(A) Grade point average.

(B) Test scores.

(C) Faculty evaluations.

(D) Interviews.

(E) Other recommendations.

(4) The applicant has received, or is approved to receive, a loan under one or more of the following designated loan programs:

(A) The Federal Family Education Loan Program (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1071 et seq.).

(B) Any educational loan program approved by the Student Aid Commission.

(5) The applicant has agreed to
 teach full time for at least four consecutive academic years, or on a part-time basis for the equivalent of four full-time academic years, after obtaining a teaching credential in a public elementary or secondary school in this state, in a subject area that is designated as a current or projected shortage area by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, or, on the date the teacher is hired, at an eligible school.

(b) An agreement shall remain valid even if the subject area under which an applicant becomes eligible to enter into an agreement ceases to be a designated shortage field by the time the applicant becomes a teacher.

(c) For the purposes of calculating eligible years of teaching for the redemption of an award, the inclusion by the Superintendent of Public Instruction of a school on a list prepared pursuant to Section 69613.1 shall apply retroactively from the date the
 school first opened.

(d) A person participating in the program pursuant to this section shall not enter into more than one agreement.

(e) A person participating in the program pursuant to this section shall not owe a refund on any state or federal educational grant or have defaulted on any student loan.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a credentialed teacher teaching in a public school ranked in the lowest two deciles on the Academic Performance Index pursuant to Section 52052, possesses a clear multiple subject or single subject teaching credential or level II education specialist credential and who has not otherwise participated in the program established by this article, is eligible to enter into an agreement for loan assumption pursuant to this article. The number of loan assumption
 agreements provided pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed 400 per year. The commission shall develop and adopt regulations for the implementation of this subdivision by January 1, 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 53.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

69613.1.

On or before January 1 of each year, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall furnish the commission with all of the following:

(a) A list of teaching fields that have the most critical shortage of teachers. The Superintendent shall review this list annually and revise the list as he or she deems necessary. The list of shortage areas furnished pursuant to this subdivision shall include the state special schools as a category separate from special education.

(b) A list of schools that serve a large population of pupils from low-income families, as designated for purposes of the Perkins Loan Program, or according to standards the Superintendent deems appropriate.

(c) A list of schools with a high percentage of teachers holding emergency-type permits. The list shall be established according to criteria determined by the Superintendent.

(d) A list of schools serving rural areas. The list shall be established according to standards deemed appropriate by the Superintendent.

(e) A list of schools ranked in the lowest two deciles on the Academic Performance Index.

(f) A list of high priority schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 516, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

69613.2.

The commission shall commence loan assumption payments, as specified in Section 69613.4, upon verification that the applicant has fulfilled all of the following:

(a) The applicant has received a California preliminary or professional clear credential, or an equivalent credential from another state, authorizing service for kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(b) The applicant has provided full-time classroom instruction, or the equivalent on a part-time basis, in a public elementary or secondary school for the equivalent of one school year.

(c) The applicant has met the requirements of the agreement and all other pertinent conditions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 516, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

69613.4.

(a) The terms of a loan assumption granted under this article shall be as follows, subject to the specific terms of each agreement:

(1) After a program participant has completed one school year of classroom instruction pursuant to Section 69613.2, the commission shall assume up to two thousand dollars ($2,000) of the participant’s outstanding liability under one or more of the designated educational loan programs.

(2) After a program participant has completed two consecutive school years of instruction, the commission shall assume up to an additional three thousand dollars ($3,000) of the participant’s outstanding liability under one or more of the designated educational loan programs, for a total loan assumption of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(3) After a program participant has completed three consecutive school years of teaching service, the commission shall assume up to a maximum of an additional three thousand dollars ($3,000) of the participant’s outstanding liability under one or more of the designated educational loan programs, for a total loan assumption of up to eight thousand dollars ($8,000).

(4) After a program participant has completed four consecutive school years of teaching service, the commission shall assume up to a maximum of an additional three thousand dollars ($3,000) of the participant’s outstanding liability under one or more of the designated educational loan programs, for a total loan assumption of up to eleven thousand dollars ($11,000).

(b) For purposes of this section, “school year” means at least 175 school days or its equivalent.

(c) An applicant who teaches on less than a full-time basis may participate in the program, but shall not be eligible for loan repayment until that person teaches for the equivalent of a full-time academic year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 516, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

69613.6.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), if a program participant fails to complete a minimum of four consecutive school years of classroom instruction on a full-time basis or the equivalent on a part-time basis as required by this article, under the terms of the agreement pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 69613, the participant shall retain full liability for all student loan obligations remaining after the commission’s assumption of loan liability for the last year of qualifying teaching service pursuant to Section 69613.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if a program participant becomes unable to complete one of the four consecutive years of teaching service on a full-time basis or the
 equivalent on a part-time basis due to serious illness, pregnancy, or other natural causes, or is called to active military duty status, the participant shall receive a deferral of the resumption of full liability for the loan for a period not to exceed one calendar year, unless approved by the commission for a longer period. The commission shall make no further payments under the loan assumption agreement until the applicable teaching requirements specified in Section 69613.2 have been specified.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a program participant shall receive a deferral of the resumption of full liability for the loan for a period not to exceed one calendar year, unless approved by the commission for a longer period, if the participant becomes unable to complete one of the four consecutive years of teaching service due to being laid off, reassigned, or other reasons beyond the control of the participant, as
 determined by the commission.

(2) The commission shall make no further payments under the loan assumption agreement until the applicable teaching requirements specified in Section 69613.2 have been satisfied.

(d) If a program participant fails to redeem an agreement for student loan assumption within 10 years of the agreement’s issuance, the participant shall retain full liability for all student loan obligations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 187, Sec. 3.   (SB 511)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

69613.7.

(a) For the purposes of this article, “subject matter shortage area” may not be construed to include teaching in a self-contained classroom or teaching pursuant to a multiple subject credential.

(b) The list, furnished by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to Section 69613.1 and relating to teaching fields that have the most critical shortage of teachers, shall not include teaching in a self-contained classroom or teaching pursuant to a multiple subject credential.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 371, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

69613.8.
